test/src/gt-norm-yamls/Pron-Oct_2016_gt-norm.yaml
      miski+Pron+Sg+Ine+Foc/gi+Use/NotNorm: miskiski
      miski+Pron+Sg+Ill+Use/NotNorm: miskisse
      miski+Pron+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi+Use/NotNorm: miskissegi
      miski+Pron+Sg+Abe+Use/NotNorm: miskita
      miski+Pron+Sg+Abe+Foc/gi+Use/NotNorm: miskitagi
      miski+Pron+Sg+Ess+Use/NotNorm: miskina
      miski+Pron+Sg+Ess+Foc/gi+Use/NotNorm: miskinagi
      miski+Pron+Sg+Trm+Use/NotNorm: miskini
      miski+Pron+Sg+Trm+Foc/gi+Use/NotNorm: miskinigi
      miski+Pron+Sg+Com+Use/NotNorm: miskiga
      miski+Pron+Sg+Com+Foc/gi+Use/NotNorm: miskigagi
      miski+Pron+Sg+Gen+Foc/gi+Use/NotNorm: miskigi
      miski+Pron+Sg+Gen+Use/NotNorm: miski
      miski+Pron+Sg+Tra+Use/NotNorm: miskiks
      miski+Pron+Sg+Tra+Foc/gi+Use/NotNorm: miskikski
      miski+Pron+Sg+Par+Foc/gi+Use/NotNorm: miskitki
      miski+Pron+Sg+Par+Use/NotNorm: miskit
      miski+Pron+Pl+Nom+Foc/gi+Use/NotNorm: miskidki
      miski+Pron+Pl+Nom+Use/NotNorm: miskid
      miski+Pron+Pl+Abl+Use/NotNorm: miskitelt
      miski+Pron+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi+Use/NotNorm: miskiteltki
      miski+Pron+Pl+Ade+Use/NotNorm: miskitel
      miski+Pron+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi+Use/NotNorm: miskitelgi
      miski+Pron+Pl+All+Use/NotNorm: miskitele
      miski+Pron+Pl+All+Foc/gi+Use/NotNorm: miskitelegi
      miski+Pron+Pl+Ela+Use/NotNorm: miskitest
      miski+Pron+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi+Use/NotNorm: miskitestki
      miski+Pron+Pl+Ine+Use/NotNorm: miskites
      miski+Pron+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi+Use/NotNorm: miskiteski
      miski+Pron+Pl+Ill+Use/NotNorm: miskitesse
      miski+Pron+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi+Use/NotNorm: miskitessegi
      miski+Pron+Pl+Abe+Use/NotNorm: miskiteta
      miski+Pron+Pl+Abe+Foc/gi+Use/NotNorm: miskitetagi
      miski+Pron+Pl+Ess+Use/NotNorm: miskitena
      miski+Pron+Pl+Ess+Foc/gi+Use/NotNorm: miskitenagi
      miski+Pron+Pl+Trm+Use/NotNorm: miskiteni
      miski+Pron+Pl+Trm+Foc/gi+Use/NotNorm: miskitenigi
      miski+Pron+Pl+Com+Use/NotNorm: miskitega
      miski+Pron+Pl+Com+Foc/gi+Use/NotNorm: miskitegagi
      miski+Pron+Pl+Gen+Foc/gi+Use/NotNorm: miskitegi
      miski+Pron+Pl+Gen+Use/NotNorm: miskite
      miski+Pron+Pl+Tra+Use/NotNorm: miskiteks
      miski+Pron+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi+Use/NotNorm: miskitekski
      mis+Pron+Sg+Par: mida
      mis+Pron+Sg+Ade+Use/Rare: mil
      mis+Pron+Sg+Abl: millelt
      mis+Pron+Sg+Ade: millel
      mis+Pron+Sg+All: millele
      mis+Pron+Sg+Ela: millest
      mis+Pron+Sg+Ine: milles
      mis+Pron+Sg+Ill: millesse
      mis+Pron+Sg+Abe: milleta
      mis+Pron+Sg+Ess: millena
      mis+Pron+Sg+Trm: milleni
      mis+Pron+Sg+Com: millega
      mis+Pron+Sg+Gen: mille
      mis+Pron+Sg+Tra: milleks
      mis+Pron+Pl+Abl: milledelt
      mis+Pron+Pl+Ade: milledel
      mis+Pron+Pl+All: milledele
      mis+Pron+Pl+Ela: milledest
      mis+Pron+Pl+Ine: milledes
      mis+Pron+Pl+Ill: milledesse
      mis+Pron+Pl+Abe: milledeta
      mis+Pron+Pl+Ess: milledena
      mis+Pron+Pl+Trm: milledeni
      mis+Pron+Pl+Com: milledega
      mis+Pron+Pl+Gen: millede
      mis+Pron+Pl+Tra: milledeks
      mis+Pron+Sg+Nom: mis
      mõni+Pron+Sg+Par+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: mõndki
      mõni+Pron+Sg+Par+Use/Rare: mõnd
      mõni+Pron+Sg+Par: mõnda
      mõni+Pron+Sg+Par+Foc/gi: mõndagi
      mõni+Pron+Sg+Ill: mõnda
      mõni+Pron+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi: mõndagi
      mõni+Pron+Sg+Ill+Use/Rare: mõnesse
      mõni+Pron+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: mõnessegi
      mõni+Pron+Pl+Par: mõnesid
      mõni+Pron+Pl+Par+Foc/gi: mõnesidki
      mõni+Pron+Sg+Abl: mõnelt
      mõni+Pron+Sg+Abl+Foc/gi: mõneltki
      mõni+Pron+Sg+Ade: mõnel
      mõni+Pron+Sg+Ade+Foc/gi: mõnelgi
      mõni+Pron+Sg+All: mõnele
      mõni+Pron+Sg+All+Foc/gi: mõnelegi
      mõni+Pron+Sg+Ela: mõnest
      mõni+Pron+Sg+Ela+Foc/gi: mõnestki
      mõni+Pron+Sg+Ine: mõnes
      mõni+Pron+Sg+Ine+Foc/gi: mõneski
      mõni+Pron+Sg+Abe: mõneta
      mõni+Pron+Sg+Abe+Foc/gi: mõnetagi
      mõni+Pron+Sg+Ess: mõnena
      mõni+Pron+Sg+Ess+Foc/gi: mõnenagi
      mõni+Pron+Sg+Trm: mõneni
      mõni+Pron+Sg+Trm+Foc/gi: mõnenigi
      mõni+Pron+Sg+Com: mõnega
      mõni+Pron+Sg+Com+Foc/gi: mõnegagi
      mõni+Pron+Sg+Gen: mõne
      mõni+Pron+Sg+Gen+Foc/gi: mõnegi
      mõni+Pron+Sg+Tra: mõneks
      mõni+Pron+Sg+Tra+Foc/gi: mõnekski
      mõni+Pron+Pl+Nom: mõned
      mõni+Pron+Pl+Nom+Foc/gi: mõnedki
      mõni+Pron+Pl+Abl: mõnedelt
      mõni+Pron+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi: mõnedeltki
      mõni+Pron+Pl+Ade: mõnedel
      mõni+Pron+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi: mõnedelgi
      mõni+Pron+Pl+All: mõnedele
      mõni+Pron+Pl+All+Foc/gi: mõnedelegi
      mõni+Pron+Pl+Ela: mõnedest
      mõni+Pron+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi: mõnedestki
      mõni+Pron+Pl+Ine: mõnedes
      mõni+Pron+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi: mõnedeski
      mõni+Pron+Pl+Ill: mõnedesse
      mõni+Pron+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi: mõnedessegi
      mõni+Pron+Pl+Abe: mõnedeta
      mõni+Pron+Pl+Abe+Foc/gi: mõnedetagi
      mõni+Pron+Pl+Ess: mõnedena
      mõni+Pron+Pl+Ess+Foc/gi: mõnedenagi
      mõni+Pron+Pl+Trm: mõnedeni
      mõni+Pron+Pl+Trm+Foc/gi: mõnedenigi
      mõni+Pron+Pl+Com: mõnedega
      mõni+Pron+Pl+Com+Foc/gi: mõnedegagi
      mõni+Pron+Pl+Gen: mõnede
      mõni+Pron+Pl+Gen+Foc/gi: mõnedegi
      mõni+Pron+Pl+Tra: mõnedeks
      mõni+Pron+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi: mõnedekski
      mõni+Pron+Sg+Nom: mõni
      mõni+Pron+Sg+Nom+Foc/gi: mõnigi
      nemad+Pron+Pl+Nom: nad
      nemad+Pron+Pl+Nom+Foc/gi: nadki
      nemad+Pron+Pl+Nom+Foc/gi+Emph: nemadki
      nemad+Pron+Pl+Nom+Emph: nemad
      nemad+Pron+Pl+Par: neid
      nemad+Pron+Pl+Par+Foc/gi: neidki
      nemad+Pron+Pl+Abl: neilt
      nemad+Pron+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi: neiltki
      nemad+Pron+Pl+Ade: neil
      nemad+Pron+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi: neilgi
      nemad+Pron+Pl+All: neile
      nemad+Pron+Pl+All+Foc/gi: neilegi
      nemad+Pron+Pl+Ela: neist
      nemad+Pron+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi: neistki
      nemad+Pron+Pl+Ine: neis
      nemad+Pron+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi: neiski
      nemad+Pron+Pl+Ill: neisse
      nemad+Pron+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi: neissegi
      nemad+Pron+Pl+Abe: nendeta
      nemad+Pron+Pl+Abe+Foc/gi: nendetagi
      nemad+Pron+Pl+Ess: nendena
      nemad+Pron+Pl+Ess+Foc/gi: nendenagi
      nemad+Pron+Pl+Trm: nendeni
      nemad+Pron+Pl+Trm+Foc/gi: nendenigi
      nemad+Pron+Pl+Com: nendega
      nemad+Pron+Pl+Com+Foc/gi: nendegagi
      nemad+Pron+Pl+Abl+Use/Rare: nendelt
      nemad+Pron+Pl+Abl: nendelt
      nemad+Pron+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: nendeltki
      nemad+Pron+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi: nendeltki
      nemad+Pron+Pl+Ade+Use/Rare: nendel
      nemad+Pron+Pl+Ade: nendel
      nemad+Pron+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: nendelgi
      nemad+Pron+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi: nendelgi
      nemad+Pron+Pl+All+Use/Rare: nendele
      nemad+Pron+Pl+All: nendele
      nemad+Pron+Pl+All+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: nendelegi
      nemad+Pron+Pl+All+Foc/gi: nendelegi
      nemad+Pron+Pl+Ela+Use/Rare: nendest
      nemad+Pron+Pl+Ela: nendest
      nemad+Pron+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: nendestki
      nemad+Pron+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi: nendestki
      nemad+Pron+Pl+Ine+Use/Rare: nendes
      nemad+Pron+Pl+Ine: nendes
      nemad+Pron+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: nendeski
      nemad+Pron+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi: nendeski
      nemad+Pron+Pl+Ill+Use/Rare: nendesse
      nemad+Pron+Pl+Ill: nendesse
      nemad+Pron+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: nendessegi
      nemad+Pron+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi: nendessegi
      nemad+Pron+Pl+Abe: nendeta
      nemad+Pron+Pl+Abe+Foc/gi: nendetagi
      nemad+Pron+Pl+Ess: nendena
      nemad+Pron+Pl+Ess+Foc/gi: nendenagi
      nemad+Pron+Pl+Trm: nendeni
      nemad+Pron+Pl+Trm+Foc/gi: nendenigi
      nemad+Pron+Pl+Com: nendega
      nemad+Pron+Pl+Com+Foc/gi: nendegagi
      nemad+Pron+Pl+Gen: nende
      nemad+Pron+Pl+Gen+Foc/gi: nendegi
      nemad+Pron+Pl+Tra+Use/Rare: nendeks
      nemad+Pron+Pl+Tra: nendeks
      nemad+Pron+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: nendekski
      nemad+Pron+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi: nendekski
      need+Pron+Pl+Par: neid
      need+Pron+Pl+Par+Foc/gi: neidki
      need+Pron+Pl+Nom: need
      need+Pron+Pl+Nom+Foc/gi: needki
      need+Pron+Pl+Abl: neilt
      need+Pron+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi: neiltki
      need+Pron+Pl+Ade: neil
      need+Pron+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi: neilgi
      need+Pron+Pl+All: neile
      need+Pron+Pl+All+Foc/gi: neilegi
      need+Pron+Pl+Ela: neist
      need+Pron+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi: neistki
      need+Pron+Pl+Ine: neis
      need+Pron+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi: neiski
      need+Pron+Pl+Ill: neisse
      need+Pron+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi: neissegi
      need+Pron+Pl+Abe: nendeta
      need+Pron+Pl+Abe+Foc/gi: nendetagi
      need+Pron+Pl+Ess: nendena
      need+Pron+Pl+Ess+Foc/gi: nendenagi
      need+Pron+Pl+Trm: nendeni
      need+Pron+Pl+Trm+Foc/gi: nendenigi
      need+Pron+Pl+Com: nendega
      need+Pron+Pl+Com+Foc/gi: nendegagi
      need+Pron+Pl+Abl+Use/Rare: nendelt
      need+Pron+Pl+Abl: nendelt
      need+Pron+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: nendeltki
      need+Pron+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi: nendeltki
      need+Pron+Pl+Ade+Use/Rare: nendel
      need+Pron+Pl+Ade: nendel
      need+Pron+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: nendelgi
      need+Pron+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi: nendelgi
      need+Pron+Pl+All+Use/Rare: nendele
      need+Pron+Pl+All: nendele
      need+Pron+Pl+All+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: nendelegi
      need+Pron+Pl+All+Foc/gi: nendelegi
      need+Pron+Pl+Ela+Use/Rare: nendest
      need+Pron+Pl+Ela: nendest
      need+Pron+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: nendestki
      need+Pron+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi: nendestki
      need+Pron+Pl+Ine+Use/Rare: nendes
      need+Pron+Pl+Ine: nendes
      need+Pron+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: nendeski
      need+Pron+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi: nendeski
      need+Pron+Pl+Ill+Use/Rare: nendesse
      need+Pron+Pl+Ill: nendesse
      need+Pron+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: nendessegi
      need+Pron+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi: nendessegi
      need+Pron+Pl+Abe: nendeta
      need+Pron+Pl+Abe+Foc/gi: nendetagi
      need+Pron+Pl+Ess: nendena
      need+Pron+Pl+Ess+Foc/gi: nendenagi
      need+Pron+Pl+Trm: nendeni
      need+Pron+Pl+Trm+Foc/gi: nendenigi
      need+Pron+Pl+Com: nendega
      need+Pron+Pl+Com+Foc/gi: nendegagi
      need+Pron+Pl+Gen: nende
      need+Pron+Pl+Gen+Foc/gi: nendegi
      need+Pron+Pl+Tra+Use/Rare: nendeks
      need+Pron+Pl+Tra: nendeks
      need+Pron+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: nendekski
      need+Pron+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi: nendekski
      nood+Pron+Pl+Par: noid
      nood+Pron+Pl+Par+Foc/gi: noidki
      nood+Pron+Pl+Abl: noilt
      nood+Pron+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi: noiltki
      nood+Pron+Pl+Ade: noil
      nood+Pron+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi: noilgi
      nood+Pron+Pl+All: noile
      nood+Pron+Pl+All+Foc/gi: noilegi
      nood+Pron+Pl+Ela: noist
      nood+Pron+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi: noistki
      nood+Pron+Pl+Ine: nois
      nood+Pron+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi: noiski
      nood+Pron+Pl+Ill: noisse
      nood+Pron+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi: noissegi
      nood+Pron+Pl+Abe: nondeta
      nood+Pron+Pl+Abe+Foc/gi: nondetagi
      nood+Pron+Pl+Ess: nondena
      nood+Pron+Pl+Ess+Foc/gi: nondenagi
      nood+Pron+Pl+Trm: nondeni
      nood+Pron+Pl+Trm+Foc/gi: nondenigi
      nood+Pron+Pl+Com: nondega
      nood+Pron+Pl+Com+Foc/gi: nondegagi
      nood+Pron+Pl+Abl+Use/Rare: nondelt
      nood+Pron+Pl+Abl: nondelt
      nood+Pron+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: nondeltki
      nood+Pron+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi: nondeltki
      nood+Pron+Pl+Ade+Use/Rare: nondel
      nood+Pron+Pl+Ade: nondel
      nood+Pron+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: nondelgi
      nood+Pron+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi: nondelgi
      nood+Pron+Pl+All+Use/Rare: nondele
      nood+Pron+Pl+All: nondele
      nood+Pron+Pl+All+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: nondelegi
      nood+Pron+Pl+All+Foc/gi: nondelegi
      nood+Pron+Pl+Ela+Use/Rare: nondest
      nood+Pron+Pl+Ela: nondest
      nood+Pron+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: nondestki
      nood+Pron+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi: nondestki
      nood+Pron+Pl+Ine+Use/Rare: nondes
      nood+Pron+Pl+Ine: nondes
      nood+Pron+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: nondeski
      nood+Pron+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi: nondeski
      nood+Pron+Pl+Ill+Use/Rare: nondesse
      nood+Pron+Pl+Ill: nondesse
      nood+Pron+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: nondessegi
      nood+Pron+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi: nondessegi
      nood+Pron+Pl+Abe: nondeta
      nood+Pron+Pl+Abe+Foc/gi: nondetagi
      nood+Pron+Pl+Ess: nondena
      nood+Pron+Pl+Ess+Foc/gi: nondenagi
      nood+Pron+Pl+Trm: nondeni
